District of Columbia statutes.
29-708.08

Liability of general partner and person dissociated as general partner when claim against limited partnership barred.

If a claim against a dissolved limited partnership is barred under § 29-708.06 or § 29-708.07, any corresponding claim under § 29-704.04 shall also be barred.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

Section References

This section is referenced in § 29-705.08.

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 808 of the Uniform Limited Partnership Act (2001 Act).